Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1724
Parking authority; termination; effect.

In the event the authority fails to commence the construction of the parking facilities within three years from the date of the proclamation issued by the Governor, as provided for by section 14-1704, establishing the authority, the authority shall terminate and any leases, grants, or rights obtained from the city or county shall forthwith terminate and revert to the city and county respectively.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 24, p. 113.